Nebraska, session 109, LB630.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-2501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2501 Sections 38-2501 to 38-2531 and sections 12 to 17 of this
act shall be known and may be cited as the Occupational Therapy Practice
Act.
Sec. 2. Section 38-2503, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2503 For purposes of the Occupational Therapy Practice Act and
elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2504 to 38-2514 and
sections 12 to 17 of this act apply.
Sec. 3. Section 38-2507, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2507 Electrotherapeutic agent modalities means modalities that
use electrotherapeutic currents and waveforms to (1) facilitate
physiologic changes in tissues to increase circulation, facilitate tissue
healing, and modulate pain, including, but not limited to, high-voltage
galvanic stimulation for tissue and wound repair and high-voltage pulsed
current and (2) facilitate neuromuscular or sensory activity to improve
muscle strength, reeducate muscle function, or modulate pain response,
including, but not limited to, neuromuscular electrical stimulation,
functional electrical stimulation, transcutaneous electrical nerve
stimulation, and interferential current. neuromuscular electrical
stimulation, transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation, and
iontophoresis. Electrotherapeutic agent modalities does not include the
use of ultraviolet light.
Sec. 4. Section 38-2512, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2512 Occupational therapy assistant means a person licensed to
assist in the practice of occupational therapy under the Occupational
Therapy Practice Act and who works under the appropriate supervision of,
-2-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
and in partnership with, an occupational therapist. holding a current
license to assist in the practice of occupational therapy.
Sec. 5. Section 38-2513, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2513 Physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities means
modalities that produce a biophysiological response through the use of
water, temperature, sound, electricity, or mechanical devices.
Sec. 6. Section 38-2514, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2514 Superficial thermal agent modalities means modalities such
as hydrotherapy, whirlpool, cryotherapy, fluidotherapy, hot packs,
paraffin, water, infrared, and other commercially available superficial
heating and cooling technologies. hot packs, cold packs, ice,
fluidotherapy, paraffin, water, and other commercially available
superficial heating and cooling technologies.
Sec. 7. Section 38-2516, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2516 (1) No person may represent himself or herself to be a
licensed occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant unless
the person is licensed in accordance with the Occupational Therapy
Practice Act or has a compact privilege to practice in accordance with
the Occupational Therapy Practice Interstate Compact.
(2) Nothing in the Occupational Therapy Practice Act shall be
construed to prevent:
(a) Any person licensed in this state pursuant to the Uniform
Credentialing Act from engaging in the profession or occupation for which
he or she is licensed;
(b) The activities and services of any person employed as an
occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant who serves in
the armed forces of the United States or the United States Public Health
Service or who is employed by the United States Department of Veterans
-3-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
Affairs or other federal agencies, if their practice is limited to that
service or employment;
(c) The activities and services of any person pursuing an accredited
course of study leading to a degree or certificate in occupational
therapy if such activities and services constitute a part of a supervised
course of study and if such a person is designated by a title which
clearly indicates his or her status as a student or trainee;
(d) The activities and services of any person fulfilling the
supervised fieldwork experience requirements of sections 38-2518 and
38-2519 if such activities and services constitute a part of the
experience necessary to meet the requirements of such sections; or
(e) Qualified members of other professions or occupations,
including, but not limited to, recreation specialists or therapists,
special education teachers, independent living specialists, work
adjustment trainers, caseworkers, and persons pursuing courses of study
leading to a degree or certification in such fields, from doing work
similar to occupational therapy which is consistent with their training
if they do not represent themselves by any title or description to be
occupational therapists or occupational therapy assistants.
Sec. 8. Section 38-2517, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2517 (1) Any person who has applied to take the examination under
section 38-2518 or 38-2519 and who has completed the education and
experience requirements of the Occupational Therapy Practice Act may be
granted a temporary license to practice as an occupational therapist or
an occupational therapy assistant. A temporary license shall allow the
person to practice only in association with a licensed occupational
therapist. and shall be valid until the date on which the results of the
next licensure examination are available to the department.
(2) A temporary license expires the earlier of: (a) The date the
person holding the temporary license is issued a permanent license; (b)
-4-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
the date the board denies a person's license application; (c) one hundred
eighty days after the date the temporary license is issued; or (d) the
date a person is notified of a failure of the licensure examination. The
temporary license shall not be renewed if the applicant has failed the
examination. The temporary license may be extended by the department,
with the recommendation of the board.
(3) In no case may a temporary license be extended beyond one year.
(4) (2) This section does not apply to a temporary license issued as
provided in section 38-129.01.
Sec. 9. Section 38-2520, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2520 (1) Each applicant for licensure pursuant to the
Occupational Therapy Practice Act shall undergo an be examined by a
written examination which tests the applicant's his or her knowledge of
the basic and clinical sciences relating to occupational therapy and
occupational therapy theory and practice including, but not limited to,
professional skills and judgment in the utilization of occupational
therapy techniques and methods and such other subjects as identified by
the entity administering the national licensure examination. Applicants
shall follow the rules as outlined by such entity and meet the minimum
requirements for the examination. Results of the examination shall be
sent to the board for verification of entry-level competency. as the
board may deem useful to determine the applicant's fitness to practice.
The board shall approve the examination and establish standards for
acceptable performance. The board may choose a nationally standardized
occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant entry-level
examination.
(2) Applicants for licensure shall be examined at a time and place
and under such supervision as the board may determine.
Sec. 10. Section 38-2526, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-5-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
38-2526 (1) An occupational therapist may perform the following
services:
(a) (1) Evaluate, develop, improve, sustain, or restore skills in
activities of daily living, work activities, or productive activities,
including instrumental activities of daily living, and play and leisure
activities;
(b) (2) Evaluate, develop, remediate, or restore sensorimotor,
cognitive, or psychosocial components of performance;
(c) (3) Design, fabricate, apply, or train in the use of assistive
technology or orthotic devices and train in the use of prosthetic
devices;
(d) (4) Adapt environments and processes, including the application
of ergonomic principles, to enhance performance and safety in daily life
roles;
(e) (5) If certified pursuant to section 38-2530, apply physical
agent and instrument-assisted modalities as an adjunct to or in
preparation for engagement in occupations when applied by a practitioner
who has documented evidence of possessing the theoretical background and
technical skills for safe and competent use;
(f) (6) Evaluate and provide intervention in collaboration with the
client, family, caregiver, or others;
(g) (7) Educate the client, family, caregiver, or others in carrying
out appropriate nonskilled interventions; and
(h) (8) Consult with groups, programs, organizations, or communities
to provide population-based services.
(2) An occupational therapist may perform any services identified in
section 38-2510 which the occupational therapist is competent to perform
based on the occupational therapist's entry-level training or continued
professional development. An occupational therapist may pursue
specialization, training, or professional development in specific
modalities, procedures, and techniques. It is the responsibility of the
-6-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
practitioner to be proficient and document proficiency in the specific
modality of practice.
Sec. 11. Section 38-2530, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2530 (1) In order to apply physical agent and instrument-assisted
modalities, an occupational therapist shall be certified pursuant to this
section. The department shall issue a certificate to an occupational
therapist to administer a physical agent and instrument-assisted modality
if the occupational therapist:
(a) Has successfully completed a training course approved by the
board and passed an examination approved by the board on the physical
agent and instrument-assisted modality;
(b) Is certified as a hand therapist by the Hand Therapy
Certification Commission or other equivalent entity recognized by the
board;
(c) Has a minimum of five years of experience in the use of the
physical agent and instrument-assisted modality and has passed an
examination approved by the board on the physical agent modality; or
(d) Has completed education during a basic educational program which
included demonstration of competencies for application of the physical
agent and instrument-assisted modality.
(2) The department shall issue a certificate to authorize an
occupational therapy assistant to set up and implement treatment using
superficial thermal agent modalities if the occupational therapy
assistant has successfully completed a training course approved by the
board and passed an examination approved by the board. Such set up and
implementation shall only be done under the onsite supervision of an
occupational therapist certified to administer superficial thermal agent
modalities.
(3) An occupational therapist shall not delegate evaluation,
reevaluation, treatment planning, and treatment goals for physical agent
-7-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
and instrument-assisted modalities to an occupational therapy assistant.
Sec. 12. Section 38-2531, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-2531 (1) The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations regarding role delineation for occupational therapy
assistants and continuing competency requirements. Continuing
professional development education is sufficient to meet continuing
competency requirements. Such requirements may also include, but not be
limited to, one or more of the continuing competency activities listed in
section 38-145 which a licensed person may select as an alternative to
continuing education.
(2) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
governing the training courses for an occupational therapist to be
certified to administer a physical agent and instrument-assisted
modality. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
governing the training course for an occupational therapy assistant to be
certified to set up and implement superficial thermal agent modalities.
In adopting such rules and regulations, the board shall give
consideration to the levels of training and experience which are
required, in the opinion of the board, to protect the public health,
safety, and welfare and to insure, to the greatest extent possible, the
efficient, adequate, and safe practice of occupational therapy. Such
rules and regulations shall include the approval of examinations and the
passing score for such examinations for certification.
Sec. 13. Aide means a person who is not licensed by the board and
who provides supportive services to occupational therapists and
occupational therapy assistants. An aide shall function only under the
guidance, responsibility, and supervision of the licensed occupational
therapist or an occupational therapy assistant. An aide does not provide
occupational therapy services. An aide shall demonstrate competence
before performing assigned and delegated client-related and non-client-
-8-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
related tasks.
Sec. 14. Electromagnetic modalities means electromagnetic
modalities that use electromagnetic waves, including radio waves,
microwaves, and light waves, to transport electrical and magnetic energy
through space to effect changes in body structures.
Sec. 15. Instrument-assisted modalities means the therapeutic use
of an instrument or tool that is manually applied by a trained
practitioner to target specific tissues including skin, fascia, and other
connective tissues or muscle.
Sec. 16. Mechanical modalities means the therapeutic use of
mechanical devices to apply force, such as compression, distraction,
vibration, or controlled mobilization, to modify biomechanical properties
and functions of tissues.
Sec. 17. (1) Practice of occupational therapy means the therapeutic
use of everyday life occupations with persons, groups, or populations to
support occupational performance and participation. Occupational therapy
practice includes clinical reasoning and professional judgment to
evaluate, analyze, and diagnose occupational challenges and provide
occupation-based interventions. Occupational therapy services include
habilitation, rehabilitation, and the promotion of physical and mental
health and wellness for clients with all levels of ability-related needs.
These services are provided for clients who have or are at risk for
developing an illness, injury, disease, disorder, condition, impairment,
disability, activity limitation, or participation restriction. Through
the provision of skilled services and engagement in everyday activities,
occupational therapy promotes physical and mental health and well-being
by supporting occupational performance in a person with, or at risk of
experiencing a range of developmental, physical, and mental health
disorders.
(2) The practice of occupational therapy includes the following
components:
-9-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
(a) Evaluation of factors affecting activities of daily living,
instrumental activities of daily living, health management, rest and
sleep, education, work, play, leisure, and social participation,
including environmental and personal factors and occupational and
activity demands that affect performance;
(b) Performance patterns, including habits, routines, roles, and
rituals;
(c) Performance skills, including motor skills, process skills, and
social interaction skills;
(d) Client factors, including body functions, body structures,
values, and spirituality;
(e) Methods or approaches to identify and select intervention,
including (i) establishment, remediation, or restoration of a skill or
ability that has not yet developed, is impaired, or is in decline, (ii)
compensation, modification, or adaptation of occupations, activities, and
contexts to improve or enhance performance, (iii) maintenance of
capabilities to prevent decline in performance in everyday life
occupations, (iv) health promotion and wellness to enable or enhance
performance in everyday life activities and quality of life, and (v)
prevention of occurrence or emergence of barriers to performance and
participation, including injury and disability prevention; and
(f) Interventions and procedures to promote or enhance safety and
performance in activities of daily living, independent activities of
daily living, health management, rest and sleep, education, work, play,
leisure, and social participation, including:
(i) Therapeutic use of occupations and activities;
(ii) Training in self-care, self-management, health management, home
management, community and work integration, school activities, and work
performance;
(iii) Identification, development, remediation, or compensation of
physical, neuromusculoskeletal, sensory–perceptual, emotional regulation,
-10-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
visual, mental and cognitive functions, pain tolerance and management,
praxis, developmental skills, and behavioral skills;
(iv) Education and training of persons, including family members,
caregivers, groups, and populations;
(v) Care coordination, case management, and transition services;
(vi) Consultation services to persons, groups, populations,
programs, organizations, and communities;
(vii) Virtual interventions;
(viii) Modification of contexts and adaptation of processes,
including the application of ergonomic principles;
(ix) Assessment, design, fabrication, application, fitting, and
training in seating and positioning, assistive technology, adaptive
devices, orthotic devices, and training in the use of prosthetic devices;
(x) Assessment, recommendation, and training in techniques to
enhance functional mobility, including fitting and management of
wheelchairs and other mobility devices;
(xi) Exercises, including tasks and methods to increase motion,
strength, and endurance for occupational participation;
(xii) Remediation of, and compensation for, visual deficits,
including low vision rehabilitation;
(xiii) Driver rehabilitation and community mobility;
(xiv) Management of feeding, eating, and swallowing to enable eating
and feeding performance;
(xv) Application of physical agent, instrument-assisted, and
mechanical modalities and the use of a range of specific therapeutic
procedures and techniques to enhance sensory, motor, perceptual, and
cognitive processing, and manual therapy techniques to enhance
performance skills;
(xvi) Facilitating the occupational participation of persons,
groups, or populations through modification of contexts and adaptation of
processes;
-11-

LB630 LB630
2025 2025
(xvii) Efforts directed toward promoting occupational justice and
empowering clients to seek and obtain resources to fully participate in
their everyday life occupations; and
(xviii) Group interventions.
Sec. 18. Supervision means a collaborative process for responsible,
periodic review and inspection of all aspects of occupational therapy
services where (1) the occupational therapist is accountable for
occupational therapy services provided by the occupational therapy
assistant and the aide, and (2) the occupational therapy assistant is
accountable for occupational therapy services provided. Supervision is
ensuring the safe and effective delivery of occupational therapy.
Sec. 19. Original sections 38-2501, 38-2503, 38-2507, 38-2512,
38-2513, 38-2514, 38-2520, 38-2526, 38-2530, and 38-2531, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 38-2516 and 38-2517, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-12-